North Dakota, session 69, SB2338.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 54-03-01.14 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
54-03-01.14. Legislative districts.
Each legislative district is entitled to one senator and two representatives. DistrictsDistrict 4
and 9 areis divided into subdistricts, and one representative must be elected from each
subdistrict. A representative elected from a subdistrict must be, on the day of election, a
qualified elector in the subdistrict from which the representative was chosen. The legislative
districts of the state are formed as follows:
1. District 1 consists of that part of the city of Williston and Stony Creek and Williston
Townships in Williams County bound by a line commencing at the point where the
centerline of thirty-second avenue west intersects with the centerline of twenty-sixth
street west, then east on twenty-sixth street west and an extended straight line until it
becomes twenty-sixth street east, then east on twenty-sixth street east until it
becomes thirteenth avenue east, then north on thirteenth avenue east and an
extended straight line until its intersection with the centerline of fifty-fourth street
northwest, then east on fifty-fourth street northwest until its intersection with the
centerline of one hundred thirty-fourth avenue northwest, also identified as United
States highway 85 bypass, then south on one hundred thirty-fourth avenue northwest
and an extended straight line until its intersection with the Williston city limit, then
south, east, north, and south on the Williston city limit until its intersection with the
centerline of state highway 1804, then west on state highway 1804 until its intersection
Page No. 1 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
with the centerline of thirty-seventh avenue southeast, then south on thirty-seventh
avenue southeast until its intersection with the centerline of forty-ninth lane northwest,
then west on forty-ninth lane northwest and an extended straight line until its
intersection with the south boundary of Williams County, then west on the south
boundary of Williams County until its intersection with an extended line from the
centerline of thirty-second avenue west, also identified as one hundred thirty-eighth
avenue northwest, then north on a straight line extended from thirty-second avenue
west and on thirty-second avenue west to the point of beginning.
2. District 2 consists of all of Burke County and Divide County; all of Williams County
except those portions contained in Districts 1 and 23; and Bicker, Cottonwood, Idaho,
James Hill, Lostwood, Manitou, Myrtle, Powers, Powers Lake, Ross, Sorkness, and
White Earth Townships in Mountrail County.
3. District 3 consists of New Prairie, Sundre, and Surrey Townships in Ward County; and
that part of the city of Minot and Nedrose Township in Ward County bound by a line
commencing at the point where the centerline of twenty-seventh street northeast
intersects with the north boundary of Nedrose Township, also identified as forty-sixth
avenue northeast, then east on the north boundary of Nedrose Township until its
intersection with the east boundary of Nedrose Township, then south on the east
boundary of Nedrose Township until its intersection with the south boundary of
Nedrose Township, then west on the south boundary of Nedrose Township until its
intersection with the Minot city limit, then south and west on the Minot city limit until its
intersection with the west boundary of Sundre Township, then north on the west
boundary of Sundre Township until its intersection with the centerline of thirteenth
street southeast, then north on thirteenth street southeast until its intersection with the
centerline of soo street southeast, then north and west on soo street southeast until its
intersection with the centerline of seventh street southeast, then north on seventh
street southeast until its intersection with the centerline of valley street, then north and
west on valley street until its intersection with the centerline of burdick expressway,
then west on burdick expressway until its intersection with the centerline of United
States highway 83, also identified as south broadway, then north on United States
highway 83 until its intersection with the centerline of nineteenth avenue, then east on
Page No. 2 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
nineteenth avenue until its intersection with airport road, then east on airport road until
its intersection with the centerline of nineteenth avenue northeast, then east on
nineteenth avenue northeast and an extended straight line until its intersection with the
centerline of twenty-seventh street northeast, then north on twenty-seventh street
northeast to the point of beginning.
4. District 4 consists of those portions of Dunn County, McKenzie County, McLean
County, Mercer County, Mountrail County, and Ward County within the Fort Berthold
reservation; all of Mountrail County except those portions contained in District 2; all of
Ward County except those portions contained in Districts 3, 5, 6, 38, and 40; and that
part of McLean County bound by a line commencing at the intersection of the Fort
Berthold reservation boundary and the north boundary of McLean County, then east
on the north boundary of McLean County until its intersection with the centerline of
United States highway 83, then south on United States highway 83 until its
intersection with the south boundary of Snow Township, then west on the south
boundary of Snow Township until its intersection with the southeast corner of North
Central McLean Unorganized Township, then west and south on the south boundary of
North Central McLean Unorganized Township until its intersection with the south
boundary of McLean County, then west on the south boundary of McLean County until
its intersection with the Fort Berthold reservation boundary, then north, west, and north
on the Fort Berthold reservation boundary to the point of beginning.
a. District 4A consists of those portions of Dunn County, McKenzie County, McLean
County, Mercer County, Mountrail County, and Ward County within the Fort
Berthold reservation.
b. District 4B consists of all of Mountrail County except those portions contained in
Districts 2 and 4A; all of Ward County except those portions contained in
Districts 3, 4A, 5, 6, 38, and 40; and that part of McLean County bound by a line
commencing at the intersection of the Fort Berthold reservation boundary and the
north boundary of McLean County, then east on the north boundary of McLean
County until its intersection with the centerline of United States highway 83, then
south on United States highway 83 until its intersection with the south boundary
of Snow Township, then west on the south boundary of Snow Township until its
Page No. 3 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
intersection with the southeast corner of North Central McLean Unorganized
Township, then west and south on the south boundary of North Central McLean
Unorganized Township until its intersection with the south boundary of McLean
County, then west on the south boundary of McLean County until its intersection
with the Fort Berthold reservation boundary, then north, west, and north on the
Fort Berthold reservation boundary to the point of beginning.
5. District 5 consists of that part of the city of Minot and Harrison Township in Ward
County bound by a line commencing at the point where the centerline of sixteenth
street northwest intersects with the centerline of fourth avenue northwest, then east on
fourth avenue northwest until it becomes third avenue northwest, then east on third
avenue northwest until its intersection with the centerline of United States highway 83,
also identified as north broadway, then south on United States highway 83 until its
intersection with burdick expressway, then east on burdick expressway until its
intersection with the centerline of valley street, then south and east on valley street
until its intersection with the centerline of seventh street southeast, then south on
seventh street southeast until its intersection with the centerline of soo street, then
south and east on soo street until its intersection with the centerline of thirteenth street
southeast, then south on thirteenth street southeast until its intersection with the
centerline of eleventh avenue southeast, then east on eleventh avenue southeast until
its intersection with the centerline of thirteenth street southeast, then south on
thirteenth street southeast until its intersection with the centerline of Untied States
highway 2, also identified as United States highway 52, until its intersection with the
centerline of United States highway 83, also identified as south broadway, then south
on United States highway 83 until its intersection with the centerline of thirty-seventh
avenue southwest, then west on thirty-seventh avenue southwest until its intersection
with the centerline of thirtieth street southwest, then north on thirtieth street southwest
until its intersection with the centerline of twentieth avenue southwest, then north and
west on twentieth avenue southwest until its intersection with the centerline of
thirty-third street southwest, then north on thirty-third street southwest until its
intersection with the centerline of United States highway 2, then east on United States
highway 2 until its intersection with the centerline of the United States highway 83
Page No. 4 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
bypass, then north on the United States highway 83 bypass until its intersection with
the centerline of the Canadian Pacific railway company right of way, then east on the
Canadian Pacific railway right of way until its intersection with the centerline of
sixteenth street northwest, then north on sixteenth street northwest to the point of
beginning.
6. District 6 consists of all of Bottineau County, McHenry County, and Renville County; all
of McLean County except those portions contained in Districts 4 and 33; and that part
of Ward County bound by a line commencing at the point where the centerline of
United States highway 83 intersects with the north boundary of Freedom Township,
also identified as one hundred twenty-first avenue southeast, then east on the north
boundaries of Freedom, Sawyer, and Willis Townships to the east boundary of Ward
County, then south on the east boundary of Ward County to the south boundary of
Ward County, then west on the south boundary of Ward County until its intersection
with the centerline of United States highway 83, then north on United States
highway 83 to the point of beginning.
7. District 7 consists of that part of the city of Bismarck and Hay Creek Township in
Burleigh County bound by a line commencing at the point where the north boundary of
Hay Creek Township intersects with the centerline of the Missouri River, then east and
south on the boundary of Hay Creek Township until its intersection with the centerline
of interstate highway 94, then west on interstate highway 94 until its intersection with
the centerline of United States highway 83, also identified as state street, then north
on United States highway 83 until its intersection with the centerline of forty-third
avenue northeast, then west on forty-third avenue northeast until its intersection with
the centerline of north washington street, then north on north washington street until its
intersection with the centerline of fifty-seventh avenue northwest, then west on
fifty-seventh avenue northwest and an extended straight line until its intersection with
the centerline of river road, then north and west on river road until its intersection with
the centerline of the north segment of burnt creek loop, then west and south on burnt
creek loop until its intersection with the centerline of a straight line extended east from
magnolia drive, then southwest on an extended straight line until its intersection with
olive tree drive, then west on olive tree drive and an extended straight line until its
Page No. 5 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
intersection with the centerline of the Missouri River, then north and west on the
Missouri River to the point of beginning.
8. District 8 consists of all of Emmons County; the city of Wilton in Burliegh and McLean
Counties; Boyd, Burnt Creek-Riverview, Gibbs, Glenview, Logan, Long Lake,
Menoken, Morton, Naughton, Taft, Telfer, Thelma, Painted Woods, and Wild Rose
Townships in Burleigh County; that part of Ecklund Township bound by a line
commencing at the point where the north boundary of Ecklund Township intersects
with the west boundary of Ecklund Township, then east, south, east, north, and east
on the north boundary of Ecklund Township until its intersection with the centerline of
twenty-sixth street northeast, then south on twenty-sixth street northeast until its
intersection with the south boundary of Ecklund Township, then east and north on the
south boundary of Ecklund Township to the point of beginning; that part of the city of
Bismarck in Burleigh County bound by a line commencing at the point where the
centerline of interstate highway 94 intersects with the centerline of business interstate
highway 94, also identified as centennial road, then east on interstate highway 94 until
its intersection with the west boundary of Gibbs Township and the Bismarck city limit,
then south on the west boundary of Gibbs Township until its intersection with the
centerline of seventeenth avenue northeast, then west on seventeenth avenue
northeast until its intersection with the centerline of fifty-sixth street northeast, then
north on fifty-sixth street northeast until its intersection with the extended centerline of
miriam avenue, then west on the extended centerline of miriam avenue and on miriam
avenue until its intersection with the centerline of business interstate highway 94, also
identified as centennial road, then north on business interstate highway 94 to the point
of beginning; and that part of Apple Creek and Missouri Townships in Burleigh County
bound by a line commencing at the point where the west boundary of Apple Creek
Township intersects with the east boundary of the Bismarck city limit, then east and
south on the west boundary of Apple Creek Township until its intersection with the east
boundary of Missouri Township, then south and west on the east boundary of Missouri
Township until its intersection with the centerline of the Missouri River, then north on
the centerline of the Missouri River until its intersection with an extended line from the
centerline of ninety-third street southeast, then north on a straight line extended from
Page No. 6 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
ninety-third street southeast and on ninety-third street southeast until its intersection
with the centerline of seventy-sixth avenue southeast, then west on seventy-sixth
avenue southeast, also identified as the south boundary of Apple Creek Township,
until its intersection with the centerline of sixty-sixth street southeast, then north on
sixty-sixth street southeast until its intersection with the centerline of forty-eighth
avenue southeast, then west on forty-eighth avenue southeast until its intersection
with the west boundary of Apple Creek Township, then north on the west boundary of
Apple Creek Township to the point of beginning.
9. District 9 consists of all of Rolette County; all of Towner County except that portion
contained in District 15; and all of Cavalier County except that portion contained in
District 19.
a. District 9A consists of all of Rolette County except that portion contained in
District 9B.
b. District 9B consists of all of Towner County except that portion contained in
District 15; all of Cavalier County except that portion contained in District 19; and
that part of Rolette County bound by a line commencing at the intersection of the
centerline of United States highway 281, also identified as thirtieth avenue
northeast, and the north boundary of Rolette County, then east on the north
boundary of Rolette County to the east boundary of Rolette County, then south
on the east boundary of Rolette County until its intersection with the centerline of
ninety-sixth street northeast, then west on ninety-sixth street northeast until its
intersection with the centerline of BIA road 1, also identified as forty-eighth
avenue northeast, then north on BIA road 1 until its intersection with the
centerline of BIA road 4, also identified as one hundred second street northeast,
then west on BIA road 4 until its intersection with the centerline of BIA road 23,
then south on BIA road 23 until its intersection with the centerline of BIA road 8,
also identified as jackrabbit road, then west on BIA road 8 until its intersection
with the centerline of BIA road 25, also identified as thirty-first avenue northeast,
then south on BIA road 25 until its intersection with the centerline of
ninety-seventh street northeast, then west on ninety-seventh street northeast
until its intersection with the Dunseith city limit, then south, west, and north on the
Page No. 7 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
Dunseith city limit until its intersection with the centerline of ninety-seventh street
northeast, then east on ninety-seventh street northeast until its intersection with
United States highway 281, also identified as thirtieth avenue northeast, then
north on United States highway 281 to the point of beginning all of Atkins, Coolin ,
Gerrard, Maza, New City, Olson, Springfield, and Zion Townships in Towner
County; and all of Chain Lakes, Coulee, De Groat, Dry Lake, Grand Harbor ,
Pelican, and Poplar Grove Townships in Ramsey County and that portion of
Odessa Township in Ramsey County within the Spirit Lake reservation; those
portions of Nelson County within the Spirit Lake reservation; all of Riggin
Township in Benson County, except that portion within the city limits of the city of
Brinsmade, and all o f Lallie, Lohnes, Minco, Mission, Oberon, Rock, Twin Tree ,
Warwick, Wes t Bay, and Wood Lake Townships and Fort Totten and Lallie North
Unorganized Townships in Benson County; that part of Eddy County within the
Spirit Lake reservation and that part of Freeborn Township bound by a line
commencing at the point where the east boundary of the Spirit Lake reservation
intersects the north boundary of Eddy County, then east and south on the
boundary of Eddy County until its intersection with the boundary of the Spirit Lake
reservation, then north and west on the Spirit Lake reservation boundary to the
point of beginning.
10. District 10 consists of that part of the city of Fargo in Cass County bound by a line
commencing at the point where the centerline of seventh avenue east intersects the
centerline of seventeenth street east, also identified as fifty-second street southwest,
then east on seventh street east until its intersection with the centerline of forty-fifth
street south, then south on forty-fifth street south until its intersection with the
centerline of thirteenth avenue south, then east on thirteenth avenue south until its
intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 29, then south on interstate
highway 29 until its intersection with the centerline of fortieth avenue south, then west
on fortieth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of forty-fifth street
south, then north on forty-fifth street south until its intersection with the centerline of
thirty-third avenue south, then west on thirty-third avenue south until its intersection
with the centerline of veterans boulevard, also identified as ninth street east, then
Page No. 8 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
north on veterans boulevard until its intersection with the centerline of seter parkway
south, then east on seter parkway south until its intersection with the centerline of
fifty-fifth street south, then north on fifty-fifth street south until its intersection with the
centerline of twenty-eighth avenue south, then east on twenty-eighth avenue south
until its intersection with the centerline of fifty-first street south, then north on fifty-first
street south until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 94, then east
on interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the west boundary of the West
Fargo city limit, then north on the West Fargo city limit, also identified as seventeenth
street east, to the point of beginning.
11. District 11 consists of that part of the city of Fargo in Cass County bound by a line
commencing at the point where the centerline of thirteenth avenue south intersects the
centerline of interstate highway 29, then east on thirteenth avenue south until its
intersection with the centerline of twenty-fifth street south, then north on twenty-fifth
street south until its intersection with the centerline of ninth avenue south, then east on
ninth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of tenth street south, then
south on tenth street south until its intersection with the centerline of thirteenth avenue
south, then east on thirteenth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of
the Red River, also identified as the east boundary of Cass County, then south on the
centerline of the Red River until its intersection with the centerline of interstate
highway 94, then west on interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline
of United States highway 81, also identified as south university drive, then south on
United States highway 81 until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-fourth
avenue south, then west on twenty-fourth avenue south until its intersection with the
centerline of twenty-fifth avenue south, then west on twenty-fifth avenue south until its
intersection with the centerline of twenty-fifth street south, then north on twenty-fifth
street south until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 94, then west
on interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway
29, then north on interstate highway 29 to the point of beginning.
12. District 12 consists of Ashland, Bloom, Corinne, Courtenay, Durham, Fried, Gray,
Nogosek, Rose, Spiritwood, and Winfield Townships in Stutsman County; and that part
of the city of Jamestown and Woodbury Township in Stutsman County bound by a line
Page No. 9 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
commencing at the point where the north boundary of Jamestown Township intersects
with the centerline of Pipestem Creek, then west, north, west, south, west, south, east,
north, east, south, west, south, east, south, east, south, west, north, west, southeast,
northwest, and south on the boundary of Jamestown Township until its intersection
with the centerline of eighty-fifth avenue southeast, also identified as county road 39,
then south on eighty-fifth avenue southeast until its intersection with the centerline of
thirty-seventh street southeast, then west on thirty-seventh street southeast until its
intersection with the centerline of tenth avenue southwest, then north on tenth avenue
southwest until its intersection with the south boundary of Jamestown Township, then
west on an extended south boundary and the south boundary of Jamestown Township
until its intersection with the west boundary of Jamestown Township, then north, west,
north, east, north, west, north, east, north, and east on the boundary of Jamestown
Township until its intersection with the centerline of business interstate highway 94,
then east on business interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of
United States highway 52, then north on United States highway 52 until its intersection
with the centerline of Pipestem Creek, also identified as the James River, then
northwest on the Pipestem Creek until its intersection with the west boundary of the
Jamestown city limit, then north on the Jamestown city limit until its intersection with
the centerline of Pipestem Creek, then north on Pipestem Creek to the point of
beginning.
13. District 13 consists of that part of the city of West Fargo and Barnes and Mapleton
Townships in Cass County bound by a line commencing at the point where the
centerline of county road 10, also identified as twelfth avenue northwest, intersects the
centerline of thirty-eighth street northwest, then east on county road 10 until its
intersection with the centerline of the Sheyenne River, then south on the Sheyenne
River until its intersection with the centerline of business interstate highway 94, also
identified as United States highway 10, then east on business interstate highway 94
until its intersection with the centerline of seventeenth street east, then south on
seventeenth street east until its intersection with the centerline of seventeenth avenue
east, then west on seventeenth avenue east until its intersection with the centerline of
ninth street east, also identified as nineteenth avenue east, then south on ninth street
Page No. 10 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
east until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 94, then west on
interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of thirty-eighth street
northwest, then north on thirty-eighth street northwest to the point of beginning.
14. District 14 consists of all of Kidder County, Pierce County, Sheridan County, and Wells
County; all of Benson County except Lallie, Lohnes, Minco, Mission, Oberon, Rock,
Twin Tree, Warwick, West Bay, and Wood Lake Townships and Fort Totten and Lallie
North Unorganized Townships those portions contained in Distric t 9 ; all of Eddy County
except that part within the Spirit Lake reservation and that part of Freeborn Township
bound by a line commencing at the point where the east boundary of the Spirit Lake
reservation intersects the north boundary of Eddy County, then east and south on the
boundary of Eddy County until its intersection with the boundary of the Spirit Lake
reservation, then north and west on the Spirit Lake reservation boundary to the point
of beginning those portions contained in Distric t 9 ; and those portions of Burleigh
County not contained in Districts 7, 8, 30, 32, 35, and 47.
15. District 15 consists of all of Cavalier County except that portion contained in
Distric t 19 ; all of Ramsey County; Atkins, Bethel, Cando, Coolin, Maza, Olson,
Springfield, and Zion Townships in Towner County; Lallie, Lohnes, Minco, Mission,
Oberon, Rock, Twin Tree, Warwick, West Bay, and Wood Lake Townships and Fort
Totten and Lallie North Unorganized Townships in Benson County; those portions of
Eddy County within the Spirit Lake reservation except that portion contained in
Distric t 9 ; and that part of Freeborn Township in Eddy County bound by a line
commencing at the intersection of the Spirit Lake reservation boundary and the north
boundary of Eddy County, also identified as thirtieth street northeast, then east on the
north boundary of Eddy County until its intersection with the east boundary of Eddy
County, also identified as ninety-sixth avenue northeast, then south on the east
boundary of Eddy County until its intersection with the Spirit Lake reservation
boundary, then north on the Spirit Lake reservation boundary to the point of
beginning all of Towner County except that portion contained in Distric t 9 .
16. District 16 consists of that part of the cities of Fargo and West Fargo and Barnes
Township in Cass County bound by a line commencing at the point where the
centerline of interstate highway 94 intersects an extended centerline of fourteenth
Page No. 11 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
street west, then southeast on interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the
centerline of ninth street east, then north on ninth street east until its intersection with
the centerline of seventeenth avenue east, then east on seventeenth avenue east until
its intersection with the east boundary of the West Fargo city limit, then south on the
east boundary of the West Fargo city limit until its intersection with the centerline of
interstate highway 94, then west on interstate highway 94 until its intersection with an
extended line from the centerline of fifty-first street south, then south on a straight line
extending from fifty-first street south and on fifty-first street south until its intersection
with the centerline of twenty-eighth avenue south, then west on twenty-eighth avenue
south until its intersection with the centerline of fifty-fifth street south, then south on
fifty-fifth street south until its intersection with the centerline of seter parkway south,
then west on seter parkway south until its intersection with the centerline of veterans
boulevard, also identified as ninth street east, then south on veterans boulevard until
its intersection with the centerline of fortieth avenue south, then west on fortieth
avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of ninth street west, then north on
ninth street west until its intersection with the south boundary of the fortieth avenue
west park, then northwest along the south boundary of the fortieth avenue west park
and on an extended straight line until its intersection with the centerline of fifteenth
street west, then north on fifteenth street west and an extended straight line until its
intersection with the centerline of fourteenth street west, then north on fourteenth
street west and an extended straight line to the point of beginning.
17. District 17 consists of that part of the city of Grand Forks and Grand Forks and Walle
Townships in Grand Forks County bound by a line commencing at the intersection of
the centerline of thirty-second avenue south and the centerline of interstate
highway 29, then east on thirty-second avenue south until its intersection with the
centerline of south columbia road, then south on south columbia road until its
intersection with the centerline of fortieth avenue south, then east on fortieth avenue
south until its intersection with the centerline of United States business highway 81,
then north on United States business highway 81 until its intersection with the
centerline of seventeenth avenue south, then east on seventeenth avenue south and
an extended straight line until its intersection with the centerline of the Red River, then
Page No. 12 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
south on the Red River until its intersection with the south boundary of Walle
Township, then west on the south boundary of Walle Township until its intersection
with the centerline of interstate highway 29, then north on interstate highway 29 to the
point of beginning.
18. District 18 consists of that part of the city of Grand Forks and Falconer, Ferry, and
Turtle River Townships in Grand Forks County bound by a line commencing at the
point where the centerline of eighteenth street northeast intersects with the north
boundary of Grand Forks County, also identified as thirty-sixth avenue northeast, then
east on the north boundary of Grand Forks County until its intersection with the
centerline of the Red River, then south on the Red River until its intersection with an
extended straight line from the centerline of seventeenth avenue south, then west on a
straight line extended from seventeenth avenue south and on seventeenth avenue
south until its intersection with the centerline of United States business highway 81,
then south on United States business highway 81 until its intersection with the
centerline of twenty-eighth avenue south, then west on twenty-eighth avenue south
until its intersection with the centerline of south seventeenth street, then north on
south seventeenth street until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-fourth
avenue south, then east on twenty-fourth avenue south until its intersection with the
centerline of south twentieth street, then north on south twentieth street until its
intersection with the centerline of the BNSF railway company right of way, then east on
the BNSF railway company right of way until its intersection with the centerline of north
sixteenth street, then north on north sixteenth street until its intersection with the
centerline of sixth avenue north, then west on sixth avenue north until its intersection
with the centerline of north twentieth street, then north on north twentieth street until its
intersection with the centerline of United States highway 2, also identified as gateway
drive, then west on United States highway 2 until its intersection with the centerline of
interstate highway 29, then north and west on interstate highway 29 until its
intersection with the centerline of twenty-fourth avenue northeast, then west on
twenty-fourth avenue northeast until its intersection with the centerline of eighteenth
street northeast, then north on eighteenth street northeast to the point of beginning.
Page No. 13 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
19. District 19 consists of all of Pembina County; all of Walsh County except that portion
contained in District 20; and Alma, East Alma, Fremont, Hay, Hope, Loam, Montrose,
North Olga, Osford, and South Olga Townships in Cavalier County.
20. District 20 consists of all of Traill County; all of Grand Forks County except for those
portions contained in Districts 17, 18, 42, and 43; and Ardoch, Forest River, Ops,
Prairie Centre, Walsh Centre, and Walshville Townships in Walsh County.
21. District 21 consists of that part of the cities of Fargo and West Fargo in Cass County
bound by a line commencing at the point where the centerline of United States
highway 10, also identified as business interstate highway 94, intersects with the
centerline of seventeenth street east, then east on United States highway 10 until its
intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 29, then north on interstate
highway 29 until its intersection with the centerline of twelfth avenue north, then east
on twelfth avenue north until its intersection with the centerline of the BNSF railway
company right of way, then south on the BNSF railway company right of way until its
intersection with the centerline of seventh avenue north, then east on seventh avenue
north until its intersection with the centerline of twelfth street north, then south on
twelfth street north until its intersection with the centerline of the BNSF railway
company right of way, then east on the BNSF railway company right of way until its
intersection with the centerline of tenth street north, also identified as United States
highway 81, then south on tenth street north until its intersection with the centerline of
business interstate highway 94, also identified as United States highway 10, then east
on interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of the Red River, then
south on the Red River until its intersection with the centerline of thirteenth avenue
south, then west on thirteenth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of
tenth street south, then north on tenth street south until its intersection with the
centerline of ninth avenue south, then west on ninth avenue south until its intersection
with the centerline of twenty-fifth street south, then south on twenty-fifth street south
until its intersection with the centerline of thirteenth avenue south, then west on
thirteenth avenue south until its intersection with forty-fifth street south, then north on
forty-fifth street south until its intersection with the centerline of seventh avenue east,
then west on seventh avenue east until its intersection with the centerline of
Page No. 14 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
seventeenth street east, then north on seventeenth street east to the point of
beginning.
22. District 22 consists of all of Cass County except those portions contained in
Districts 10, 11, 13, 16, 21, 27, 41, 44, 45, and 46.
23. District 23 consists of Buford, Hardscrabble, and Trenton Townships in Williams
County; and that part of the city of Williston and Judson, Missouri Ridge, Mont,
Pherrin, Round Prairie, and Williston Townships in Williams County bound by a line
commencing at a point where the centerline of a straight line extending west from
fiftieth street northwest intersects the west boundary of Round Prairie Township, then
west on the extended line and fiftieth street northwest until its intersection with the
centerline of one hundred fifty-first avenue northwest, then south on one hundred
fifty-first avenue northwest until its intersection with the centerline of United States
highway 2, then east on United States highway 2 until its intersection with the
centerline of United States highway 85, then north, west, and east on United States
highway 85 until its intersection with the centerline of one hundred thirty-fourth avenue
northwest, also identified as state business highway 85, then south on one hundred
thirty-fourth avenue northwest until its intersection with the centerline of fifty-fourth
street northwest, then west on fifty-fourth street northwest until its intersection with an
extended straight line from the centerline of thirteenth avenue east, then south on a
straight line extended from thirteenth avenue east and on thirteenth avenue until it
becomes twenty-sixth street east, then west on twenty-sixth street east and an
extended straight line until its intersection with the centerline of thirty-second avenue
west, then south on thirty-second avenue west until its intersection with the centerline
of one hundred thirty-eighth avenue northwest, then south on one hundred
thirty-eighth avenue northwest and an extended straight line until its intersection with
the centerline of the Missouri River, then west, south, east, and north on the Missouri
River until its intersection with the west boundary of Round Prairie Township, then
north on the west boundary of Round Prairie Township to the point of beginning.
24. District 24 consists of all of Barnes County and Ransom County.
25. District 25 consists of all of Richland County and Marboe and Tewaukon Townships in
Sargent County.
Page No. 15 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
26. District 26 consists of all of McKenzie County except that portion contained in the Fort
Berthold reservation; all of Halliday and Killdeer Townships in Dunn County; and that
part of South Dunn Township in Dunn County bound by a line commencing at the point
where the north boundary of South Dunn Township intersects the centerline of
one hundred first avenue southwest, then east on the north boundary of South Dunn
Township until its intersection with the east boundary of Dunn County, then south on
the east boundary of Dunn County until its intersection with an extended line from the
centerline of eighteenth street southwest, then west on a straight line extending from
eighteenth street southwest and on eighteenth street southwest until its intersection
with the centerline of one hundred first avenue southwest, then north on one hundred
first avenue southwest to the point of beginning.
27. District 27 consists of that part of Pleasant and Stanley Townships in Cass County;
and that part of the cities of Fargo and Horace in Cass County bound by a line
commencing at the point where the centerline of fifty-second avenue intersects the
extended centerline of seventy-sixth street south, then east on fifty-second avenue
until its intersection with the centerline of veterans boulevard south, then north on
veterans boulevard south until its intersection with the centerline of thirty-third avenue
south, then east on thirty-third avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of
forty-fifth street south, then south on forty-fifth street south until its intersection with the
north boundary of Stanley Township, then east on the north boundary of Stanley
Township and the extended centerline of the north boundary of Stanley Township until
its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 29, then south on interstate
highway 29 until its intersection with the centerline of sixty-fourth avenue south, then
east on sixty-fourth avenue south until its intersection with the east boundary of
Stanley Township, then south on the east boundary of Stanley Township until its
intersection with an extended straight line from the centerline of seventy-third avenue
south, then east on the straight line extended from seventy-third avenue south and on
seventy-third avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of seventy-fifth
avenue south, also identified as sixteenth street south, then south and east on
seventy-fifth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of eagle point drive
south, then south on eagle point drive south until its intersection with the centerline of
Page No. 16 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
seventy-sixth avenue south, then east on seventy-sixth avenue south until its
intersection with the centerline of south university drive, then south on south university
drive until its intersection with the north boundary of Stanley Township, then east and
north on the north boundary of Stanley Township until its intersection with the
centerline of chrisan boulevard, then northeast on chrisan boulevard until its
intersection with the centerline of seventy-first avenue south, then west on
seventy-first avenue south until its intersection with the west boundary of Stanley
Township, then north, west, north, and east on the boundary of Stanley Township until
its intersection with the centerline of the Red River, then south on the Red River until
its intersection with the south boundary of Pleasant Township, then west and north on
the south boundary of Pleasant Township until its intersection with the south boundary
of the Horace city limit, then west on the south boundary of the Horace city limit until
its intersection with the west boundary of the Horace city limit, then north on the west
boundary of the Horace city limit to the point of beginning.
28. District 28 consists of all of Dickey County, LaMoure County, Logan County, and
McIntosh County; and all of Sargent County except that portion contained in
District 25.
29. District 29 consists of all of Foster County, Griggs County, Nelson County, and Steele
County; all of Nelson County except that portion contained in Distric t 9 ; and all of
Stutsman County except that portion contained in District 12.
30. District 30 consists of those parts of the city of Bismarck, and Apple Creek, Hay Creek,
Lincoln-Fort Rice, and Missouri Townships in Burleigh County bound by a line
commencing at a point where the centerline of the Missouri River intersects with the
centerline of west bismarck expressway, then east on west bismarck expressway until
its intersection with the east property line of the riverwood golf course, then south on
the east property line of the riverwood golf course until its intersection with a straight
line extended west from tucson avenue, then east on the extended line until its
intersection with the centerline of south washington street, then south on south
washington street until its intersection with the centerline of east burleigh avenue, then
east on east burleigh avenue until its intersection with the centerline of south twelfth
street, then north on south twelfth street until its intersection with the centerline of
Page No. 17 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
basin avenue, then east on basin avenue until its intersection with the centerline of
airport road, then north and east on airport road until its intersection with the centerline
of east broadway avenue, then west on east broadway avenue until its intersection
with the centerline of north nineteenth street, then north on north nineteenth street and
a straight line extended north from north nineteenth street until its intersection with the
centerline of east boulevard avenue, then east on east boulevard avenue until its
intersection with the centerline of north twenty-sixth street, then north on north
twenty-sixth street until its intersection with the centerline of east divide avenue, then
east on east divide avenue until its intersection with the centerline of east bismarck
expressway, then north on east bismarck expressway until its intersection with the
centerline of interstate highway 94, then east and north on interstate highway 94 until
its intersection with a straight line extending north from brigade street, then south on
the extended line until its intersection with the centerline of miriam avenue, then east
on miriam avenue until its intersection with the centerline of fifty-second street
northeast, then south on fifty-second street northeast until its intersection with the
boundary of Apple Creek Township, then west and south on the boundary of Apple
Creek Township until its intersection with a straight line extending south from cavalry
drive, then south on the extended line until its intersection with the centerline of lincoln
road, then east on lincoln road until its intersection with the centerline of fifty-second
street southeast, then south on fifty-second street southeast until its intersection with
the centerline of forty-eighth avenue southeast, then east on forty-eighth avenue
southeast until its intersection with the centerline of sixty-sixth street southeast, then
south on sixty-sixth street southeast until its intersection with the centerline of
seventy-sixth avenue southeast, then east on seventy-sixth avenue southeast until its
intersection with the centerline of ninety-third street southeast, then south on
ninety-third street southeast until its intersection with the centerline of the Missouri
River, then north, west, and east on the Missouri River to the point of beginning.
31. District 31 consists of all of Grant County and Sioux County; Acme, Beery, Brittian,
Campbell, Cannon Ball, Castle Rock, Central Hettinger, Chilton, Farina, Highland,
Mott, Odessa, Solon, Steiner, and Walker Townships in Hettinger County; and that part
of Morton County not contained in Districts 33, 34, and 36.
Page No. 18 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
32. District 32 consists of those parts of the city of Bismarck and Lincoln-Fort Rice
Township in Burleigh County bound by a line commencing at the point where the
centerline of business interstate highway 94, also identified as west main avenue,
intersects the centerline of the Missouri River, then east on business interstate
highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of rosser avenue, then east on
rosser avenue until its intersection with the centerline of bell street, then north on bell
street until its intersection with the centerline of west avenue c, then east on west
avenue c until its intersection with the centerline of griffin street, then north on griffin
street until its intersection with the centerline of tom o'leary trail, then east on
tom o'leary trail until its intersection with the centerline of north washington street, then
south on north washington street until its intersection with the centerline of west
avenue c, then east on west avenue c until its intersection with the centerline of first
street, then south on first street until its intersection with the centerline of east
broadway avenue, then east on east broadway avenue until its intersection with the
centerline of north ninth street, then north on north ninth street until its intersection with
the centerline of east avenue e, then east on east avenue e until its intersection with
the centerline of north nineteenth street, then south on north nineteenth street until its
intersection with the centerline of east broadway avenue, then east on east broadway
avenue until its intersection with the centerline of airport road, then south on airport
road until its intersection with the centerline of basin avenue, then west on basin
avenue until its intersection with the centerline of south twelfth street, then south on
south twelfth street until its intersection with the centerline of east burleigh avenue,
then west on east burleigh avenue until its intersection with the centerline of south
washington street, then north on south washington street until its intersection with a
straight line extended west from tucson avenue, then west on the straight line until its
intersection with the east property line of the riverwood golf course, then north on the
east property line of the riverwood golf course until its intersection with the centerline
of west bismarck expressway, then west on west bismarck expressway until its
intersection with the centerline of the Missouri River, then north and west on the
Missouri River to the point of beginning.
Page No. 19 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
33. District 33 consists of all of Oliver County; all of Mercer County except that portion
within in the Fort Berthold reservation; that part of the city of Mandan and East Morton
Township in Morton County bound by a line commencing at the point where the north
boundary of Morton County intersects the west boundary of East Morton Township,
then east on the north boundary of Morton County until its intersection with the
centerline of the Missouri River, then south and east on the Missouri River until its
intersection with the centerline of a straight line extended east from old red trail, then
west on the extended line until its intersection with the Mandan city limit, then north,
west, and south on the Mandan city limit until its intersection with a straight line
extending north from the east property line of union cemetery, then south on the
extended straight line until its intersection with the north property line of union
cemetery, then west on the north property line of union cemetery and an extended
straight line until its intersection with the centerline of old red trail, then west on old red
trail until its intersection with the centerline of eighth avenue northwest, then north on
eighth avenue northwest until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-seventh
street northwest, then west on twenty-seventh street northwest until its intersection
with the centerline of twelfth avenue northwest, then south on twelfth avenue
northwest and an extended straight line until its intersection with the centerline of old
red trail, then west on old red trail until its intersection with the centerline of highland
road, then north and west on highland road until its intersection with the Mandan city
limit, then west and south on the Mandan city limit until its intersection with the
centerline of old red trail, then west on old red trail until its intersection with the
centerline of twenty-fifth avenue, then south on twenty-fifth avenue until its intersection
with the centerline of interstate highway 94, then west on interstate highway 94 until its
intersection with the west boundary of East Morton Township, then north on the west
boundary of East Morton Township to the point of beginning; and that part of
Longfellow, South McLean, Underwood, and Victoria Townships in McLean County
bound by a line commencing at a point where the centerline of the Missouri River
intersects the north boundary of Underwood Township, then north and east on the
boundary of Underwood Township until its intersection with the north boundary of
Victoria Township, then east on the north boundary of Victoria Township until its
Page No. 20 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
intersection with the centerline of United States highway 83, then south on United
States highway 83 until its intersection with the Washburn city limit, then north, east,
and south on the Washburn city limit until its intersection with the centerline of ninth
street southwest, then east on ninth street southwest until its intersection with the
centerline of state highway 41, then south on state highway 41 until its intersection
with the centerline of twenty-sixth street northeast, then west and south on twenty-
sixth street northeast until its intersection with the south boundary of McLean County,
then west on the south boundary of McLean County until its intersection with the
Wilton city limit, then west, north, and south on the Wilton city limit until its intersection
with the south boundary of McLean County, then west on the south boundary of
McLean County until its intersection with the centerline of the Missouri River, then
north and west on the Missouri River to the point of beginning.
34. District 34 consists of that part of the city of Mandan and Mandan Unorganized
Township in Morton County bound by a line commencing at a point where the Mandan
city limit intersects a straight line extending west from the centerline of division street
northwest, then east on the straight line and division street northwest until its
intersection with the centerline of collins avenue, then north on collins avenue until its
intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 94, then east and south on
interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of Mandan avenue, then
south on Mandan avenue until its intersection with the centerline of business interstate
highway 94, also identified as memorial highway, then south and east on business
interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of the Missouri River,
then south on the Missouri River until its intersection with a straight line extending east
from forty-seventh street, then west on the extended line and forty-seventh street until
its intersection with the centerline of state highway 1806, then north on state highway
1806 until its intersection with the centerline of fort lincoln road, then north on fort
lincoln road until its intersection with the centerline of state highway 1806, then north
and west on state highway 1806 until its intersection with the centerline of nineteenth
street southeast, then west on nineteenth street southeast until its intersection with the
Mandan city limit, then south, east, west, and north on the Mandan city limit until its
intersection with the centerline of twenty-seventh street southeast, then east on
Page No. 21 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
twenty-seventh street southeast until its intersection with the centerline of fourteenth
avenue, then south and east on fourteenth avenue until its intersection with the
centerline of percheron drive, then south and west on percheron drive until its
intersection with the centerline of buckskin road, then north and west on buckskin road
until its intersection with the centerline of tenth avenue, then north on tenth avenue
until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-seventh street, then west on
twenty-seventh street and an extended straight line until it intersects with the Mandan
city limit, then west and north on the Mandan city limit until it intersects with a straight
line extending south from the centerline of ridge drive, then north on the extended line
until it intersects with the centerline of lincoln court, then east on lincoln court until its
intersection with the centerline of westview place, then north on westview place until
its intersection with the centerline of twenty-third street southeast, then west on
twenty-third street southeast until its intersection with a straight line extending south
from the centerline of ridge drive, then north on the extended line and ridge drive until
its intersection with the centerline of nineteenth street southeast, then west on
nineteenth street southeast until its intersection with the centerline of state highway 6,
then north on state highway 6 until its intersection with the centerline of sunny road,
then west on sunny road and an extended straight line until its intersection with the
centerline of sixteenth avenue southwest, then north and east on the extended line
and sixteenth avenue southwest until its intersection with the Mandan city limit, then
north, east, and west on the Mandan city limit to the point of beginning.
35. District 35 consists of that part of the city of Bismarck in Burleigh County bound by a
line commencing at a point where the centerline of the Missouri River intersects the
centerline of interstate highway 94, then east on interstate highway 94 until its
intersection with the centerline of east bismarck expressway, then south on east
bismarck expressway until its intersection with the centerline of east divide avenue,
then west on east divide avenue until its intersection with the centerline of north
twenty-sixth street, then south on north twenty-sixth street until its intersection with the
centerline of east boulevard avenue, then west and south on east boulevard avenue
until its intersection with the centerline of north nineteenth street, then south on north
nineteenth street and a straight line extended south from north nineteenth street until
Page No. 22 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
its intersection with the centerline of east avenue e, then west on east avenue e until
its intersection with the centerline of north ninth street, then south on north ninth street
until its intersection with the centerline of east broadway avenue, then west on east
broadway avenue until its intersection with the centerline of north first street, then
north on north first street until its intersection with the centerline of west avenue c, then
west on west avenue c until its intersection with the centerline of north washington
street, then north on north washington street until its intersection with the centerline of
tom o'leary trail, then west on tom o'leary trail until its intersection with the centerline of
griffin street, then south on griffin street until its intersection with the centerline of west
avenue c, then west on west avenue c until its intersection with the centerline of bell
street, then south on bell street until its intersection with the centerline of rosser
avenue, then west on rosser avenue until its intersection with the centerline of
business interstate highway 94, also identified as west main avenue, then west on
business interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of the Missouri
River, then north and west on the Missouri River to the point of beginning.
36. District 36 consists of all of West Morton Township in Morton County; that part of
South Dunn Township in Dunn County not contained in Districts 26 and 39; that part of
East Morton Township in Morton County bound by a line commencing at the point
where the centerline of county road 84 intersects with the centerline of interstate
highway 94, then east on interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline
of Sweet Briar Creek, then south on Sweet Briar Creek until its intersection with the
centerline of old highway 10, then west on old highway 10 until its intersection with an
extended straight line from the centerline of thirty-eighth avenue, then south on a
straight line extended from thirty-eighth avenue, on thirty-eighth avenue, and on a
straight line extended from thirty-eighth avenue until its intersection with an extended
line from the centerline of forty-first street, then west on a straight line extended from
forty-first street and on forty-first street until its intersection with the centerline of
county road 84, then north on county road 84 to the point of beginning; and those
portions of the city of Dickinson and Dickinson North and East Stark Townships in
Stark County bound by a line commencing at the point where the centerline of
one hundred seventh avenue southwest intersects with the centerline of thirtieth street
Page No. 23 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
southwest, then east on thirtieth street southwest until its intersection with the
centerline of ninety-third avenue southwest, then north on ninety-third avenue
southwest until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-ninth street southwest,
then east on twenty-ninth street southwest until its intersection with the centerline of
ninety-first avenue southwest, then north on ninety-first avenue southwest and on an
extended straight line until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-eighth street
southwest, then east on twenty-eighth street southwest and on an extended straight
line until its intersection with seventy-eighth avenue southwest, then south on
seventy-eighth avenue southwest until its intersection with the centerline of thirtieth
street southwest, then east on thirtieth street southwest until its intersection with the
east boundary of Stark County, then south on the east boundary of Stark County until
its intersection with the south boundary of Stark County, then west on the south
boundary of Stark County until its intersection with the west boundary of East Stark
Township, then north on the west boundary of East Stark Township until its intersection
with the centerline of fortieth street southwest, then west on fortieth street southwest
until its intersection with the centerline of tenth avenue southeast, then north on tenth
avenue southeast until its intersection with the centerline of twentieth street southeast,
then west on twentieth street southeast until its intersection with the centerline of sixth
avenue southeast, then north on sixth avenue southeast until its intersection with the
Dickinson city limit, then west and north on the Dickinson city limit until its intersection
with the centerline of fifteenth street southeast, then east on fifteenth street southeast
until its intersection with the centerline of southview avenue, then north on southview
avenue until its intersection with the centerline of eighth street southwest, then west on
eighth street southwest until its intersection with the centerline of eighth avenue
southwest, then north on eighth avenue southwest until its intersection with the
centerline of fifth street southwest, then west on fifth street southwest until its
intersection with the Dickinson city limit, then north and west on the Dickinson city limit
until its intersection with the centerline of state street, then north on state street until its
intersection with the centerline of villard street, also identified as business interstate
highway 94, then east on villard street until its intersection with the centerline of tenth
avenue east, then north on tenth avenue east until its intersection with the centerline
Page No. 24 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
of fourteenth street east, then west on fourteenth street east until its intersection with
the centerline of fourth avenue east, then north on fourth avenue east and an
extended straight line until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-first street east,
then west on twenty-first street east until its intersection with the centerline of tenth
avenue west, then north on tenth avenue west until its intersection with the centerline
of thirty-fourth street southwest, then east on thirty-fourth street southwest until its
intersection with the centerline of state highway 22, then north on state highway 22
until its intersection with the centerline of thirty-third street southwest, then east on
thirty-third street southwest until its intersection with the centerline of one hundred
ninth avenue southwest, then north on one hundred ninth avenue southwest until its
intersection with the centerline of thirty-second street southwest, then east on
thirty-second street southwest until its intersection with the centerline of one hundred
eighth avenue southwest, then south on one hundred eighth avenue southwest until
its intersection with the centerline of thirty-third street southwest, then east on
thirty-third street southwest until its intersection with the centerline of one hundred
seventh avenue southwest, then north on one hundred seventh avenue southwest to
the point of beginning.
37. District 37 consists of that part of the city of Dickinson in Stark County bound by a line
commencing at the point where the centerline of thirty-fourth street southwest
intersects the centerline of one hundred fourteenth avenue southwest, then east on
thirty-fourth street southwest until its intersection with the centerline of tenth avenue
west, then south on tenth avenue west until its intersection with the centerline of
twenty-first street west, then east on twenty-first street west, also identified as
twenty-first street east, until its intersection with the extended centerline of fourth
avenue east, then south on the extended centerline of fourth avenue east until its
intersection with the centerline of fourteenth street east, then east on fourteenth street
east until its intersection with the centerline of tenth avenue east, then south on tenth
avenue east until its intersection with the centerline of villard street, also identified as
business interstate highway 94, then west on villard street until its intersection with the
centerline of thirtieth avenue west, then north on thirtieth avenue west and a straight
line extending north until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 94,
Page No. 25 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
then west on interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of one
hundred fourteenth avenue southwest, then north on one hundred fourteenth avenue
southwest to the point of beginning.
38. District 38 consists of all of Afton, Burlington, Burt, Des Lacs, Foxholm, Kirkelie,
Rolling Green, and St. Marys Townships in Ward County; and those parts of Afton,
Eureka, Harrison, and Waterford Townships and those portions of the city of Minot in
Ward County not contained in Districts 3, 5, and 40.
39. District 39 consists of all of Adams County, Bowman County, Billings County, Golden
Valley County, and Slope County; all of Stark County except those portions contained
in Districts 36 and 37; all of Hettinger County except that part contained in District 31;
and that part of Dunn County bound by a line commencing at the point where the north
boundary of South Dunn Township intersects with the centerline of one hundred
twentieth avenue, then west on the north boundary of South Dunn Township until its
intersection with the centerline of eighteenth street southwest, then east on eighteenth
street southwest and an extended straight line until its intersection with the east
boundary of South Dunn Township, then south on the east boundary of South Dunn
Township until its intersection with the centerline of the Knife River, then southwest on
the Knife River until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-first street southwest,
then west on twenty-first street southwest until its intersection with the centerline of
eighty-second avenue southwest, then south on eighty-second avenue southwest until
its intersection with an extended centerline of twenty-fourth street southwest, then
west on an extended centerline and on twenty-fourth street southwest until its
intersection with the centerline of state highway 8, then south on state highway 8 until
its intersection with the centerline of twenty-eighth street southwest, then west on
twenty-eighth street southwest until its intersection with an extended straight line from
the centerline of ninety-first avenue southwest, then south on a straight line extended
from ninety-first avenue southwest and on ninety-first avenue southwest until its
intersection with the centerline of twenty-ninth street southwest, then west on
twenty-ninth street southwest until its intersection with the centerline of ninety-third
avenue southwest, then south on ninety-third avenue southwest until its intersection
with the centerline of thirtieth street southwest, then west on thirtieth street southwest
Page No. 26 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
until its intersection with the centerline of one hundred twentieth avenue southwest,
then north on one hundred twentieth avenue southwest to the point of beginning.
40. District 40 consists of all of Margaret, Maryland, McKinley, and Tatman Townships in
Ward County, that part of Waterford Township and the Minot air force base bound by a
line commencing at the point where the east boundary of Waterford Township
intersects with the centerline of bomber boulevard, then northwest on bomber
boulevard until its intersection with the centerline of peacekeeper place, then northeast
on peacekeeper place until its intersection with the east boundary of Waterford
Township, and then south on the east boundary of Waterford Township to the point of
beginning; and those parts of Eureka, Harrison, and Nedrose Townships, and that part
of the city of Minot bound by a line commencing at the point where the centerline of
thirtieth street northwest intersects with the north boundary of Eureka Township, also
identified as one hundred twenty-eighth avenue northwest, then east and south on the
north boundary of Eureka Township until its intersection with the northwest corner of
Nedrose Township, then east on the north boundary of Nedrose Township until its
intersection with the centerline of twenty-seventh street northeast, then south on
twenty-seventh street northeast until its intersection with an extended line from the
centerline of nineteenth avenue, then west on a straight line extended from nineteenth
avenue and on nineteenth avenue until its intersection with the centerline of airport
road, then west on airport road until its intersection with the centerline of nineteenth
avenue, then west on nineteenth avenue until its intersection with the centerline of
north broadway, also identified as United States highway 83, then south on north
broadway until its intersection with the centerline of third avenue northwest until it
becomes fourth avenue northwest, then west on fourth avenue northwest until its
intersection with the centerline of sixteenth street northwest, then north on sixteenth
street northwest until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-first avenue
northwest, then west on twenty-first avenue northwest until its intersection with the
centerline of thirtieth street northwest, then north on thirtieth street northwest to the
point of beginning.
41. District 41 consists of the cities of Frontier and Prairie Rose in Cass County and that
part of the city of Fargo and Stanley Township in Cass County bound by a line
Page No. 27 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
commencing at the point where the centerline of interstate highway 94 intersects the
centerline of interstate highway 29, then east on interstate highway 94 until its
intersection with the centerline of twenty-fifth street south, then south on twenty-fifth
street south until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-fifth avenue south, then
east on twenty-fifth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of eighteenth
street south, then south on eighteenth street south until its intersection with the
centerline of thirtieth avenue south, then west on thirtieth avenue south until its
intersection with the centerline of twenty-second street south, then south on
twenty-second street south until its intersection with the centerline of thirty-second
avenue south, then west on thirty-second avenue south until its intersection with the
centerline of twenty-fifth street south, then south on twenty-fifth street south until its
intersection with the centerline of fifty-second avenue south, also identified as county
road 6, then west on fifty-second avenue south until its intersection with the centerline
of prosperity way south, then south on prosperity way south and an extended straight
line until its intersection with the centerline of sixty-fourth avenue south, then west on
sixty-fourth avenue south and an extended straight line until its intersection with the
centerline of interstate highway 29, then north on interstate highway 29 until its
intersection with an extended line from the north boundary of Stanley Township, then
west on the extended boundary of Stanley Township and on the north boundary of
Stanley Township until its intersection with the centerline of forty-fifth street south, then
north on forty-fifth street south until its intersection with the centerline of fortieth
avenue south, then east on fortieth avenue south until its intersection with the
centerline of interstate highway 29, then north on interstate highway 29 to the point of
beginning.
42. District 42 consists of that part of the city of Grand Forks and Blooming, Brenna,
Grand Forks, Mekinock, and Rye Townships in Grand Forks County bound by a line
commencing at the point where the centerline of twenty-eighth street northeast
intersects with the centerline of twenty-fourth avenue northeast, then east on
twenty-fourth avenue northeast until it intersects with the centerline of interstate
highway 29, then south on interstate highway 29 until it intersects with the centerline of
twelfth avenue northeast, then west on twelfth avenue northeast until it intersects with
Page No. 28 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
an extended straight line from the centerline of nineteenth street, then north on a
straight line extended from nineteenth street and on nineteenth street until it intersects
with the centerline of United States highway 2, also identified as eighteenth avenue,
then west on United States highway 2 until it intersects with the centerline of
twenty-eighth street northeast, then north on twenty-eighth street northeast to the point
of beginning.
43. District 43 consists of that part of Grand Forks Township and that part of the city of
Grand Forks in Grand Forks County bound by a line commencing at the intersection of
the centerline of interstate highway 29 and the centerline of the BNSF railway
company right of way, then east on the BNSF railway company right of way until its
intersection with the centerline of south twentieth street, then south on south twentieth
street until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-fourth avenue south, then east
on twenty-fourth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of south
seventeenth street, then south on south seventeenth street until its intersection with
the centerline of twenty-eighth avenue south, then east on twenty-eighth avenue south
until its intersection with the centerline of United States highway 81, then south on
United States highway 81 until its intersection with the centerline of fortieth avenue
south, then west on fortieth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of
south columbia road, then north on south columbia road until its intersection with the
centerline of thirty-second avenue south, then west on thirty-second avenue south
until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 29, then north on
interstate highway 29 to the point of beginning.
44. District 44 consists of that part of the city of Fargo and Cass County bound by a line
commencing at the point where the centerline of north university drive intersects the
centerline of twenty-eighth avenue north, then east on twenty-eighth avenue north until
its intersection with the centerline of broadway north, then north on broadway north
until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-eighth avenue north, then east on
twenty-eighth avenue north until its intersection with the centerline of elm street north,
then south on elm street north until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-second
avenue north, then east on an extended straight line from twenty-second avenue north
until its intersection with the centerline of the Red River, then south, west, and east on
Page No. 29 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
the Red River until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 94, then
west on interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of tenth street
north, then north on tenth street north until its intersection with the centerline of the
BNSF railway company right of way, then north and west on the BNSF railway
company right of way until its intersection with the centerline of twelfth street north,
then north on twelfth street north until its intersection with the centerline of seventh
avenue north, then west on seventh avenue north until its intersection with the
centerline of the BNSF railway company right of way, then north and west on the
BNSF railway company right of way until its intersection with the centerline of twelfth
avenue north, then east on twelfth avenue north until its intersection with the centerline
of north university drive, then north on north university drive to the point of beginning.
45. District 45 consists of all of Berlin, Gardner, Harwood, Kinyon, Noble, and Wiser
Townships and the cities of Harwood, North River, and Reile's Acres in Cass County;
and that portion of the cities of Fargo and West Fargo and Reed Township in Cass
County bound by a line commencing at the point where the north boundary of Reed
Township intersects the west boundary of Reed Township, then west on the north
boundary of Reed Township until its intersection with the centerline of the Red River,
then south and east on the Red River until its intersection with a straight line extending
east from the centerline of twenty-second avenue north, then west on the straight line
until its intersection with the centerline of elm street north, then north on elm street
north until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-eighth avenue north, then west
on twenty-eighth avenue north until its intersection with the centerline of broadway
north, then south on broadway north until its intersection with the centerline of
twenty-eighth avenue north, then west on twenty-eighth avenue north until its
intersection with the centerline of north university drive, then south on north university
drive until its intersection with the centerline of twelfth avenue north, then west on
twelfth avenue north until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 29,
then south on interstate highway 29 until its intersection with the centerline of business
interstate highway 94, also identified as main avenue, then west on business interstate
highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of the Sheyenne River, then north,
east, and west on the Sheyenne River until its intersection with the centerline of state
Page No. 30 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
highway 10, then west on state highway 10 until its intersection with the west
boundary of Reed Township, then north on the west boundary of Reed Township to the
point of beginning.
46. District 46 consists of the city of Briarwood and that part of the city of Fargo and
Stanley Township in Cass County bound by a line commencing at the point where the
centerline of thirty-second avenue south intersects the centerline of twenty-fifth street
south, then east on thirty-second avenue south until its intersection with the centerline
of twenty-second avenue south, then north on twenty-second avenue south until its
intersection with the centerline of thirtieth avenue south, then east on thirtieth avenue
south until its intersection with the centerline of eighteenth street south, then north on
eighteenth street south until it intersects with the centerline of twenty-fifth avenue
south, then east on twenty-fifth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of
south university drive, then north on south university drive until its intersection with the
centerline of interstate highway 94, then east on interstate highway 94 until its
intersection with the centerline of the Red River, then south on the Red River until its
intersection with the south boundary of Stanley Township, then west, south, east, and
south on the boundary of Stanley Township until its intersection with the centerline of
seventy-first avenue south, then east on seventy-first avenue south until its
intersection with the centerline of chrisan boulevard, then south on chrisan boulevard
until its intersection with the east boundary of Stanley Township, then south on the
east boundary of Stanley Township until its intersection with the centerline of
seventy-sixth avenue south, then east on seventy-sixth avenue south until its
intersection with the centerline of eagle point drive south, then north on eagle point
drive south until its intersection with the centerline of seventy-fifth avenue south, then
west and north on seventy-fifth avenue south, also identified as sixteenth street south,
until its intersection with the centerline of seventy-third avenue south, then west on
seventy-third avenue south and an extended straight line until its intersection with the
east boundary of Stanley Township, then north on the east boundary of Stanley
Township until its intersection with an extended line from the centerline of prosperity
way south, then north on the straight line extended from prosperity way south until its
intersection with the centerline of county road 6, also identified as fifty-second avenue
Page No. 31 25.1124.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
south, then east on county road 6 until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-fifth
street south, then north on twenty-fifth street south to the point of beginning.
47. District 47 consists of that part of the city of Bismarck and Hay Creek Township in
Burleigh County bound by a line commencing at a point where the centerline of the
north segment of burnt creek loop intersects the centerline of river road, then south
and east on river road until its intersection with a straight line extending west from the
centerline of fifty-seventh avenue north, then east on the straight line and fifty-seventh
avenue north until its intersection with the centerline of north washington street, then
south on north washington street until its intersection with the centerline of forty-third
avenue northeast, then west on forty-third avenue northeast until its intersection with
the centerline of United States highway 83, also identified as state street, then south
on United States highway 83 until its intersection with the centerline of interstate
highway 94, then west on interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline
of the Missouri River, then north and west on the Missouri River until its intersection
with a straight line extending west from the centerline of olive tree drive, then east on
olive tree drive until its intersection with a straight line extending southwest from a
point on the centerline of burnt creek loop that is east on an extended straight line
from the centerline of magnolia drive, then north and east on burnt creek loop to the
point of beginning.
SECTION 2. APPLICATION. This Act does not impact the term of office of any member of
the Legislative Assembly elected in 2024.
Page No. 32 25.1124.01000